Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2801YC (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 69. a. By July 1, 2026, develop and 3 distribute to all school districts an age-appropriate model 4 program for firearm safety instruction for students enrolled 5 in kindergarten through grade twelve. The model program for 6 students enrolled in kindergarten through grade six shall be 7 based on the eddie eagle gunsafe program developed by the 8 national rifle association. The model program for students 9 enrolled in grades seven through twelve shall be based on 10 the hunter education course developed by the national rifle 11 association and, if adopted by a school district, would satisfy 12 the school districtâs responsibilities under section 279.50B. 13 b. School districts are encouraged to implement the model 14 program for students enrolled in kindergarten through grade six 15 developed pursuant to paragraph âaâ . 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 279.50B Firearm safety instruction. 17 Commencing with the school year beginning July 1, 2026, 18 the board of directors of each school district shall offer or 19 make available an approved firearm safety instruction course 20 to all students enrolled in the school district in grades 21 seven through twelve and all students enrolled in grades 22 seven through twelve attending a nonpublic school in the 23 school district. An instructor for an approved firearm safety 24 instruction course is not required to be a teacher licensed 25 by the board of educational examiners. School districts may 26 offer courses at sites that are not located on school district 27 property, including nonpublic school facilities within the 28 school district. An approved course offered during the summer 29 months, on Saturdays, after regular school hours during the 30 regular terms or partly in one term or summer vacation period 31 and partly in the succeeding term or summer vacation period, as 32 the case may be, shall satisfy the requirements of this section 33 to the same extent as an approved course offered during the 34 regular school hours of the school calendar. 35 -1- LSB 2801YC (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. _____ Sec. 3. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 1 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 2 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 3 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 4 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 5 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 6 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 7 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 8 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 9 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 10 districts. 11